test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ciermih_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čiermih: # 1B d-kk,  rm-´rm
    čiermih+N+Sg+Nom: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Gen: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Acc: čiermih
    čiermih+N+Sg+Ill: čieˊrmihân
    čiermih+N+Sg+Loc: čie´rmihist
    čiermih+N+Sg+Com: čie´rmiháin
    čiermih+N+Sg+Abe: čiermihttáá
    čiermih+N+Ess: čie´rmihin
    čiermih+N+Par: čie´rmihid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Nom: čie´rmiheh
    čiermih+N+Pl+Gen: čie´rmihij
    čiermih+N+Pl+Acc: čie´rmihijd
    čiermih+N+Pl+Ill: čie´rmiháid
    čiermih+N+Pl+Loc: čie´rmihijn
    čiermih+N+Pl+Com: čie´rmihijguin
    čiermih+N+Pl+Abe: čie´rmihijttáá
